Utah statutes.
16-6a-1008.7.   Conversion to or from a domestic limited liability company.

(1) (a)  A domestic nonprofit corporation may convert to a domestic limited liability company subject to Title 48, Chapter 3, Utah Revised Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, by complying with:

(i)  this Subsection (1); and

(ii)  Section 48-3-1006.

(b)  If a domestic nonprofit corporation converts to a domestic limited liability company in accordance with this Subsection (1), the articles of conversion shall:

(i)  comply with Section 48-3-1008; and

(ii)  if the corporation has any members, provide for:

(A)  the cancellation of any membership; or

(B)  the conversion of any membership in the domestic nonprofit corporation to a membership interest in the domestic limited liability company.

(c)  Before articles of conversion may be filed with the division, the conversion shall be approved:

(i)  in the manner provided for the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the domestic nonprofit corporation; or

(ii)  if the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the domestic nonprofit corporation do not provide the method for approval:

(A)  if the domestic nonprofit corporation has voting members, by all of the members of the domestic nonprofit corporation regardless of limitations or restrictions on the voting rights of the members; or

(B)  if the nonprofit domestic corporation does not have voting members, by a majority of:

(I)  the directors in office at the time the conversion is approved by the board of directors; or

(II)  if directors have not been appointed or elected, the incorporators.

(2)  A domestic limited liability company may convert to a domestic nonprofit corporation subject to this chapter by:

(a)  filing articles of incorporation in accordance with this chapter; and

(b)  complying with Section 48-3-1006.

(3)  Any conversion under this section may not result in a violation, directly or indirectly, of:

(a)  Section 16-6a-1301; or

(b)  any other provision of this chapter.

